Oklahoma, session 2026, SB459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.468 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The intersection of U.S. Highway 77 and State Highway 11 in Kay
County shall be designated as the “Ike Glass Memorial Intersection”.
The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent
markers bearing that name to be placed at the intersection.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 10, 2025 - DO PASS





SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB459 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)